Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1950.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2308(b.1) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.* * *(b.1) Additional [exception.--A] exceptions.--(1) A semiautomatic rifle may be used to hunt game in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission.(2) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(4), the commission may direct that persons may lawfully hunt or aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt any snow goose during the snow goose conservation season through the use of a semiautomatic shotgun or magazine shotgun without regard to the restriction that the shotgun is plugged to a two-shell capacity in the 123456789101112131415161718 magazine. If the commission so directs, the commission shall transmit notice of the direction to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB1950PN3005 - 2 - 123456